Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202181-12,226
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Shovel-Ready Capital Recovery and Investment Act.

Laws 2021, LB566, § 8.
May 26, 2021